Hawaii statutes.
[§11-407] Contested case hearing.
(a) A contested case hearing shall be conducted pursuant to chapter 91 and any
rules adopted by the commission, except as provided in this section.

(b) If a hearing is held before the
commission, the commission shall not be bound by strict rules of evidence when
conducting a hearing to determine whether a violation of this part has
occurred, and the degree or quantum of proof required shall be a preponderance
of the evidence.

(c) The commission or hearings officer, if
there is no dispute as to the facts involved in a particular matter, may permit
the parties to proceed by memoranda of law in lieu of a hearing unless the
procedure would unduly burden any party or is otherwise not conducive to the
ends of justice.

(d) A record shall be made of the proceeding.

(e) All parties shall be afforded full
opportunity to present evidence and argument on all issues involved.

(f) Any person who appears before the
commission shall have all of the rights, privileges, and responsibilities of a
witness appearing before the courts of this State. All witnesses summoned
before the commission or hearings officer shall receive reimbursements as paid
in like circumstances in the courts of this State. Any person whose name is
mentioned during a proceeding before the commission and who may be adversely
affected thereby may appear or file a written statement for incorporation into
the record of the proceeding.

(g) If a hearing is held before a hearings
officer, the hearings officer shall render a recommended decision for the
commission's consideration. Any party adversely affected by the decision may
file written exceptions with the commission within fifteen days after receipt
of a copy of the decision by certified mail.

(h) The commission, as expeditiously as
possible after the close of the commission's hearing, shall issue its final
determination of violation together with separate findings of fact and
conclusions of law regarding whether a violation of this part has been
committed. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next